Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3666.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.12, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Intervention. (a) For each student identified under subdivision 2, the district shall provide reading intervention to accelerate student growth and reach the goal of reading at or above grade level by the end of the current grade and school year. A district is encouraged to provide reading intervention through a MTSS framework. If a student does not read at or above grade level by the end of the current school year, the district must continue to provide reading intervention until the student reads at grade level. District intervention methods shall encourage family engagement and, where possible, collaboration with appropriate school and community programs that specialize in evidence-based instructional practices and measure mastery of foundational reading skills, including phonemic awareness, phonics, decoding, fluency, and oral language. Intervention may include but is not limited to requiring student attendance in summer school, intensified reading instruction that may require that the student be removed from the regular classroom for part of the school day, extended-day programs, or programs that strengthen students' cultural connections. (b) A district or charter school deleted text begin is strongly encouraged todeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end provide a personal learning plan for a student who is unable to demonstrate grade-level proficiency, as measured by the statewide reading assessment in grade 3 or a screener identified by the Department of Education under section 120B.123. The district or charter school must determine the format of the personal learning plan in collaboration with the student's educators and other appropriate professionals. The school must develop the learning plan in consultation with the student's parent or guardian. The personal learning plan must include targeted instruction that is evidence-based and ongoing progress monitoring, and address knowledge gaps and skill deficiencies through strategies such as specific exercises and practices during and outside of the regular school day, group interventions, periodic assessments or screeners, and reasonable timelines. The personal learning plan deleted text begin maydeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end include grade retentiondeleted text begin ,deleted text end if it is in the student's best interestdeleted text begin ; a student may not be retained solely due to delays in literacy or not demonstrating grade-level proficiencydeleted text end . A school must maintain and regularly update and modify the personal learning plan until the student reads at grade level. This paragraph does not apply to a student under an individualized education program. (c) Starting in the 2025-2026 school year, a district must use only evidence-based literacy interventions. Districts are strongly encouraged to use intervention materials approved by the Department of Education under the Read Act. (d) Starting in the 2026-2027 school year, to provide a Tier 2 literacy intervention, a paraprofessional or other unlicensed person, including a volunteer, must be supervised by a licensed teacher who has completed training in evidence-based reading instruction approved by the Department of Education, and has completed evidence-based training developed under the Read Act by CAREI or the regional literacy networks under section 120B.124, subdivision 4, or a training that the department has determined meets or exceeds the requirements of section 120B.124, subdivision 4.